Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-23,103
Charges or compensation of qualified trustee.

Any charges or compensation of a qualified trustee for acting as such under the Public Funds Deposit Security Act shall be paid by the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution and in no event shall be chargeable to any governmental unit, to the custodial official, or to any officer of the governmental unit. Such charges or compensation shall not be a lien or charge upon the deposit guaranty bond or the securities held by the qualified trustee prior, superior, or equal to the rights to and interests under such deposit guaranty bond or in such securities of the governmental unit or of the custodial official. The custodial official shall be relieved from any liability to the governmental unit or to the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution for the loss or destruction of any deposit guaranty bond or securities pledged, deposited, or in which a security interest has been granted.

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 48;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 97.